Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1911.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4905.2. Swatting costs.(a) Additional penalty.--In addition to a penalty imposed under section 4905.1 (relating to swatting), a court may order a person convicted or adjudicated under 4905.1(a) to pay to the State, local unit of government, law enforcement agency, firefighter, fire company, emergency medical services agency or provider or a government employee or contractor the costs of responding to the false report that is the basis of the swatting offense, including the use of police, fire, medical or other emergency response personnel, vehicles and teams.(b) Juveniles.--The following apply to a juvenile ordered to 123456789101112131415161718 pay costs under this section:(1) If the court determines that the juvenile is or will be unable to pay the costs ordered, after notice to the juvenile's parent or legal guardian and an opportunity for the persons to be heard, the court may order the parent or legal guardian having supervisory responsibility of the juvenile at the time of the act upon which the order is based to pay a portion of the costs ordered that is outstanding. An order under this paragraph does not relieve the juvenile of the juvenile's obligation to pay the costs as ordered, but the amount owed shall be offset by an amount paid by the juvenile's parent or legal guardian.(2) If the court orders a parent or legal guardian to pay costs under paragraph (1), the court shall take into account the financial resources of the parent or legal guardians and the burden that the payment of the cost will impose. If the court requires a parent or legal guardian to pay costs under paragraph (1), the court shall provide for payment to be made in specified installments over a specific period of time.(3) A parent or legal guardian who has been ordered to pay costs under paragraph (1) may petition the court for a modification of the amount of the costs owed or for a cancellation of an unpaid portion of the obligation. The court shall cancel all or part of the obligation due if the court determines that the payment of the amount due will impose a manifest hardship on the parent or legal guardian.(c) Multiple entities.--If more than one unit of government or other type of entity incurs a cost in responding to a swatting offense, the court may order the person convicted to 20250HB1911PN2392 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimburse each unit of government or other type of entity for the expense incurred.(d) Process.--The amount ordered to be paid under this section shall be paid to the court at a time and in a manner prescribed by the court. The clerk of the court shall transmit the appropriate amount to the unit of government or other entity named in the order to receive reimbursement. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, reimbursement shall be made immediately. This subsection does not prohibit a court from authorizing payments to be made according to a payment schedule to be completed during a specified time.(e) Enforcement.--An order for reimbursement issued under this section may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the district attorney of a county in which a government unit or other entity entitled to reimbursement under the order is located.(f) Definition.--For purposes of this subsection, the term "costs of responding" includes:(1) The salary or wages, including overtime pay, of a police officer or law enforcement agency for time spent responding to the swatting offense from which the following occurred:(i) The conviction or adjudication of delinquency.(ii) The arrest of the person convicted or adjudicated delinquent.(iii) Processing the person after arrest.(iv) Preparing reports on the incident.(v) Investigating the incident.(vi) Collecting and analyzing evidence.(vii) Preparing for and appearing at a pretrial 20250HB1911PN2392 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeding or trial.(2) The salary, wages or other compensation, including overtime pay, of a firefighter or emergency medical services provider for time spent in responding to the swatting offense.(3) The salary, wages or other compensation, including overtime pay, of a prosecutor for time spent investigating and prosecuting the crime charged under 4905.1.(4) The salary, wages or other compensation, including overtime pay, of other government employees or contractors for time spent in responding to the swatting offense.(5) The costs of supplies expended or equipment used by the law enforcement agency, fire company, emergency medical services agency, other government employees or contractors in responding to the swatting offense.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1911PN2392 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516